EquanimousMind [info] Would really love a polling function on reddit at times like this.Yea I was diagnosed with depression about 6 months ago. I got put on LExapro, which helped quite a bit. Also tried psychiatry, but quit that. I found meditation to be most useful. [info] None [info] 1320432987 [info] test
medinaiscool [info] Similar situation. Except 21 and happened this past September. I hadn’t moved from my bed the past month so my friend took me to the hospital. I was diagnosed with depression and PTSD. I thought my parents would be furious with me but they weren’t. My dad is out to find and murder him, I’m worried he will. [info] None [info] 1544127465 [info] test
feelingdivorcey [info] Husband just declared divorce - this is day 2 since he left. Trying not to self destruct.... This is a [cross post](http://www.reddit.com/r/Divorce/comments/1hkmyq/doomed_from_the_start_now_feeling_very_scared/) from r/divorce.  I am just alone all day today with no one to talk to.  I keep trying to dwell on the things about him that drove me nuts:  his getting mad at me for watching shows without him even though I would always happily watch it again with him, how he felt that I was a princess, his antisocial behavior with my family, his judgements, the time I told him I was grabbing a drink with a new (girl) friend at work and how he got mad at me for not asking him first, how he would randomly go through my phone....I think the best part about all of this is that I don't have to worry about crying hysterically anymore since it was a staple in our relationship bc of the things he has said.  I am afraid of being alone.  I just went to the doctor and found out my weight - I gained 30 pounds since I met him. I have been diagnosed with depression.  I have no friends - but I am working on the friendship with the girl from work. I don't want to burden her though. And I still will see my therapist every week.Twox - what is your take on all this?  Any words of wisdom? Comfort?  Anything helps.  I feel so numb I haven't cried yet over this.Edit:  I keep replaying the last "scene" between us.  It is killing me - I was right to get angry right?  His words felt like daggers and his contention that he had done nothing wrong was crazy making.  This was the exact scene:He comes through the door to find me applying to jobs on the computer.  I am in a good mood bc I had just been to my therapist.  He tells me how he had such a nice time at his mom's house and that "everyone" was there.  This was a subtle jab at me since I told him that sometimes I don't feel like going to his mom's (he trapped me into confessing this btw).  That night I just couldn't make it due to my therapist appointment and bc I needed to apply to other jobs.  He then starts asking me what I had planned for my kid (15 yrs old) brother the next night.  I responded by saying I hadn't thought of it but it will be late when I picked him up as he is 1.5 hrs away.  I said I wasn't sure what to do at the 9 pm hr - probably just get some food and hang out st home with the new kitty (my brother loves animals and has never met my kitten).I asked if he had any suggestions since he felt I should have planned something to which he replied that he had already planned the next day and shouldn't have to plan the night before.  I replied saying I wasn't looking for plans - just wanted to know what he thought there was to do that late since I clearly wasn't thinking outside the box.  He just kept saying he didn't want to plan.  We went round in circles until he said how I had a weird relationship with my brother - that I didn't seem to want to plan anything with him.  This led to me being extremely upset and I tried to reason with him telling him that this hurt my feelings. He insisted he had done nothing wrong.  I blew up at him bc I felt the old feelings of subtle manipulation rise again.  He would often say nasty stuff to me but follow it up with "it's the truth, how can you be mad?"Through tears and sobs I told him that I couldn't take the criticisms anymore - that if he was going to speak to me that way that he knew where the door was. He took me up on that and we haven't spoken since.  I had just had enough of the judgements and guilt trips.  Was I justified? Am I nuts?Edit 2:  I just remembered a fabulously embarrassing and heart wrenching argument about porn.  I told him when we met that I watched it as a single gal.  He had "caught" me watching (and by caught I mean saw Internet history) on my computer but he had noticed it was on dates that I was on my business trips or one day it was on a night we had broken up. He confronted me when he found this on my computer, made me feel ashamed and embarrassed.  Told me that when we had kids he didn't want them stumbling on my porn sites bc I hadn't done a good enough job hiding my tracks.  Furthermore, He said he didn't feel that it should be part of a relationship - it was fine for single life nut not fine for married life.  We fought and fought and eventually I "got my way" (his favorite phrase) and he succumbed to having porn in his married life.......at which point he would declare that he was going to go watch it while I was home since it was now allowed.  I would not have had a problem with that though I never watched it except for when I was alone - but I could tell he was doing it to "teach me a lesson.". He contends that he has "changed" by allowing porn to be part of his married life.Edit 3:  none of this has really worked.  No amount of vilifying him has made me feel better.  I am finally starting to cry.  I feel so incredibly alone.  All I can think of is how it felt when he held me tight and told me everything was alright. I am breaking down so hard right now. [info] None [info] 1372977313 [info] test
bottleninja [info] Self-doubt Sometimes I wonder whether I'm just going through a teenage phase. Even though I've been diagnosed with depression, part of me just wonders whether I'm lying to myself and just insisting in wallowing in misery.Just needed to get this off my chest. [info] None [info] 1522328870 [info] test
DaddyDeathKnight [info] I'm in a very similar camp as far as depression and your chicken/egg thoughts. I was diagnosed with depression but I was still using during that time period so who knows what caused what at least in my case. We will get through it though! [info] None [info] 1489753528 [info] test
disconsolateSage [info] My father died not too long ago. Most of my family was in tears, but I sort of felt, well, numb.It might have been because I didn't have the best relationship with him, but I didn't feel upset in the traditional sense of the word. It took a while to set in, and I was diagnosed with depression.I've 'gotten over it', but I still go to therapy and take medication for the lasting depression. (Which wasn't really caused by his death as much as it triggered the reaction, I suppose.)It doesn't take too long to feel better. However, if you still feel awful after a while, I would suggest seeking help so it doesn't get even worse. [info] None [info] 1462399816 [info] test
RavinDaveR [info] I was diagnosed with depression before my wife ran off with another man, and now I am so low I can't see up. [info] None [info] 1433516434 [info] test
Beasag [info] I knew.  At 14 yo I knew.  The problem was that I couldn't get anyone else to agree.  Always excuses.  Doctors told me it was stress.. biofeedback.. it was big in the 80''s (kinda like yoga now).  2 suicide attempts.  Goodness knows how many just breakdowns where I would just sob for hours and then not come out of my room except to shower (and sometime eat) for a few weeks.  Every 18 months a new job.. it was a cycle that usually ended up with me quitting... but I have also been fired.  2 divorces.  I couldn't explain why I couldn't stay with them.. I just couldn't stay another day.  I had a ton of psychosomatic illnesses.  If it could be caused by stress... then I probably had it.  Near daily migraines, ulcers, IBS, asthma, horrible PMS, worse periods (although that turned out to be adenomyosis not stress like all the docs said).   Finally at 30 yo I was diagnosed with depression.  Therapy.  Meds.  23 years later I'm still here.  But some days it's a close call.   [info] None [info] 1498367934 [info] test
constipatedshitting [info] [Advice Request] Anger Management Sorry I don't know how to flair. Anyway, I need some help with anger management. I was was raised by my mom and nGma from a young age. Things were petty nice because I usually wasn't with my nGma, but with my mom. We went to the school she taught at, and it was good for me. My brother and I were really close. However, it was decided that we go to the school we were zoned for, and our gParents would take care of us until our mom picked us up. Around this time I began having issues. My self-esteem dropped, I started getting sick (I hadn't been sick since first grade, now I was in third), and I got into "fights" (read, nGma shouting at me) with my nGma. I then began having short depression episodes. I often considered suicide, but usually chickened out once I got to the knife drawer. I didn't talk to anybody about our "fights" because I thought they were normal. It usually started over homework, then my nGma would raise her voice, and tell me to stop shouting, all while screaming her head off. ( I now know that this is a deflection tactic). It got worse in sixth grade, where there was more work, more complex, and my grades dropped. My self-esteem dropped with it. Seventh grade went decently, and I started feeling better. Eighth grade however, was bad. Most of my classes consisted of me being made fun of, even by a teacher. (He made me hate performing music, something I really enjoyed). Then, I went to a state funded counselor. I stopped spending so much time with nGma, and it got better. However, I ran out of state funded visits, and had to stop going. I was diagnosed with depression, and knowing that doesn't really effect me. However, now I am extremely easy to anger. I can go from happy to wanting to hurt someone in an instant. My breathing exercises stopped working, and I don't know how to control my anger. Does anyone have some tips?Looking back, I didn't mean to throw down this wall of text. Sorry. [info] None [info] 1441112130 [info] test
gambinosbambino [info] If you don't mind please explain what you mean by "normality." I was diagnosed with depression at 13, my parents don't really believe in mental health issues (they're African) so I've never been treated/attempted treatment. I go through episodes of severe depression where my mind become a literal prison and I'll suffer from mild panic attacks as a result. I'm 21 now and I've made the decision not to settle for a normal life (I.e. Kids, marriage) but instead be somewhat detached from everyone/everything with the reasoning that if at any time shit gets real I can kill myself without worrying about my actions impacting those around me. With all that being said I'm afraid of planning a future with someone and instead I'm a live in the moment-type-of-person.Any thoughts, advice would be appreciated [info] None [info] 1494993678 [info] test
RayningAcid [info] As an expat, sometimes...I keep waiting for them to give me a bill.  I keep thinking if I tell them that in X year I was diagnosed with depression, that they might call it a pre-existing condition and not treat me for it.  I still have paranoia when I go.  So silly.  I'm just *waiting* for the hidden co-pay! [info] Logan 7/25/2013 [info] 1367513491 [info] test
throwaway812567 [info] How did you deal with the prescription part? I've been diagnosed with depression and I was on medication, but it's been a long time since I've been to the therapist. [info] None [info] 1570903674 [info] test
shankie13 [info] It's occurred to me that this has become more of a rant then a question but I have been diagnosed with depression before (I'm on medication) but this isn't like anything I've felt [info] None [info] 1485905108 [info] test
Turdcervix [info] And why I need to get the Fuck out of Alabama. Seriously, 6 months in Alabama and I was diagnosed with depression and on medication. Christ it sucks.  [info] None [info] 1493251940 [info] test
Vertigo17498 [info] Pv=nrt.The dude gave us values for r in multiple units so that for example I can calculate a missing volume in atm if it is liter or calculate missing pressure and another one for multiple units an told us to memorize them.I am like what the fuck. We know each unit and their conversions and can get the pressure and volume in any fucking unit I want.The pressure of a fixed amount of ideal gas at constant temperature is inversely proportional to the volume according to boyle’s law or by pv=nrt and change it to p=nrt/v and nrt is a constant so if v doubles p halves.No we dont do that here we use a longer more stupider method.Yesterday I had a panic attack and I have been diagnosed with depression and wanted to lay down and do nothing.But then I remembered that I want to change the world,do something instead of being slaved off in a company like elon musk.I then snapped out of it and continued to study.This is to put into prespective how important this is to me.Without this determination I would continue to feel this “emptiness”.But this determination is slowly fading especially since today a professor gave me 0/10 in the physics lab for no reason whatsoever even though I calculated all values correctly.I feel like this college is eating away at my sanity.What would you do ? [info] None [info] 1540849272 [info] test
xenobees [info] University and Depression I was diagnosed with depression at the beginning of my second year of university. I have been medicated for it since. On a bad day, the worst I feel is general emotional numbness and/or very low moods and persistent tiredness. While unmedicated, it is worse, but still manageable - I can't really focus, my short-term memory suffers and I feel tired from the moment I wake up to the moment I go to sleep.However, as the end of my degree nears, things are getting much more severe and unmanageable than even unmedicated depression. I take 10mg of Escitalopram daily but I can barely cope with my day-to-day life. I don't want to get out of bed because I'm constantly completely exhausted from the moment I get up, I don't want to study, I don't want to interact with people and I'm struggling to even care about the consequences of these effects. I'm still somehow scraping through on discipline alone but I'm absolutely petrified I'll end up fucking everything up somehow and failing out just because I'm having a bad mental health lapse at the moment.I stay organised, try to get enough sleep, try to discipline myself, try to stay on track and not get distracted, but it's impossible. I can't concentrate. I can't sleep. I can't remember the simplest things and I sometimes even struggle to keep up with conversations. I don't want to tell my boyfriend because I don't want him to be stressed out (or even end our relationship, because I suspect that at the moment I'm quite an emotional burden to cope with) and I don't want to tell my friends because I don't want to inflict that on them - they are largely also studying or beginning new careers and I want to be a positive and supportive person, not a drain. I have no idea what to do from here. The fact that my medication doesn't seem to be helping much terrifies me - it's crucial that I am able to get by until I graduate but that's looking more and more difficult.Any help, advice, experience is welcome. [info] None [info] 1576190431 [info] test
Kayzar_Hermit [info] Sorry to bother, but I was hoping for some advice. Hello Reddit.It's my first time on this subreddit. Found it linked in a post and thought hopefully this'd be a good place for help or getting some advice. I was diagnosed with depression roughly 6 months ago, but I'd say I've been suffering for the most part of 3-4 years. At the moment, I'm going through counselling, which I feel like is helping me. It's making me think about stuff I've previously tried to forget about and I think it's helping.However, I keep feeling worried that when the counselling is over (which is in a few more sessions), that I'll simply slip back into my old ways of feeling down and depressed most of the time. I was wondering if anyone had any advice on what I could do, or whether I'm just being silly or something. (I do apologise, I just tend to get worried sometimes). Thanks for reading. [info] None [info] 1344719174 [info] test
RikoThePanda [info] &gt;Probably going to type in a really long story here, so I'll add a TL;DR for all you lazies.&gt;I'll give you a backstory of my life before I go into any detail, I was a genius kid (130IQ) and was in all extended classes, father left my family when I was around 5, never saw/heard from him again, I was on Ritalin (ADHD meds) from 6 til 11 and stopped after some bad side affects, I was diagnosed with depression at 14 after smoking weed (heavily) for just over a year, never bothered to take my medication around that time, but it wasn't until I made the turning point in my life I made the decision to take them, which honestly made the biggest difference.&gt;Crime life started at around 13, with my mate from school, who I pretty much always was smoking weed with, I used to sneak out and we'd just get stoned and wander around, getting into mischief, it got worse as I did it more often, I met more 'bad' people and made more mistakes. My next bestfriend after this dude (we always had a bit of a problem with eachother) was called Ethan, and I used to hang out with him practically everyday, I would never go home, never tell my mum where I was (now that I think back, I can't believe the absolute stress I must have put my single mother, raising two other children through when I used to leave home and not come back without any notice for periods of time, this is what makes me feel the worst about my decisions, as I never even bothered to consider it when I was doing it). But everyday when I would chill with him, in the night we would break into cars and houses and steal hundreds and hundreds of dollars everynight, to feed our drug addiction. It got worse as we got better at being criminals.&gt;There is too much detail for me to add to be able to type out so I'll try quickly explain the time period when I was Ethan's friend. I had pretty much been smoking drugs everyday, been to juvie on two occasions, both times was only for 3 days, my mum bailed me out, and I realise now I never really thanked her.) I was also homeless for certain periods of being his friend.&gt;Life got really shit after we were checking cars one night, and no joke because we did this so often, three suburbs were always on the look for us car thieves (there was only us two), and this night we started really early to try maximize profits (6PM), bad decision. The third house the dude caught me and I ran, about two hours later when we were checking cars my mate gets caught by this dude going into a neighbors car and legs it, and I run too, in the opposite direction. While walking down the street to attempt to meet up with E around the corner, the same guy who caught me before (this time on a bike) found me, and started following me, I tried leading him around and then 30 minutes later, this 4wd drives up onto the pathway and stops right infront of me, four guys jump out, one with a baseball bat, and they begin to mob the fuck out of me, no joke. So after that, the cops were called, and I had to spend the worst night of my life lying in the copshop on a concrete bench. The next morning the popo came in and escourted me to their car, I asked where I was going and they told me to Banksia Hill Correctional Centre[1] this jail was filled with aboriginals and gearheads (meth), I was surprised by how fucked up most of these kids were at such a young age... but anyway, skip jail time and fastfoward a month...&gt;Mum broke me out, and again, I don't think I ever thanked her enough and as I'm typing this I'm really realising how much damage and stress and just plain hurt I must have put her through, and after this is posted, I think I'm going to continue to make things right with her as much as I can.&gt;But ofcourse, with my drug addled mind, and me being used to rolling on the streets everynight, no responsibilities, didn't handle being placed under house curfew and not being allowed to leave very well, and so within the week me and E were out doing crime again, skip all details from here to when I was caught again... My girlfriend, who was also homeless... but she was a beautiful and smart girl, was at my house when mum had left me home alone, so we decided to do cars quickly to get a few sticks tomorrow, I ended up getting two hundred dollars in about two hours and six packets of cigarettes, so I felt like I was king.&gt;early that morning we are awoken by two policemen knocking on the door, turns out they wanted to preform a search warrant and walked right through the UNLOCKED (FML) door and found me inside, they placed me under arrest and searched my house, found bongs, shisha, ciggies, and the cash. my whole family was pretty much called over at this point, making the matter so much worse... but after the police took me to the station, my grandad (the most important person in my life) came and saw me, and I could tell how much it hurt him to see me inside a police questioning room. After an hour chat, and another night on the cold bench (this was the worst night of my life, after losing all that stuff (which I didnt even work for, but I was so keen to enjoy), having my girlfriend being taken home in a cop car, plus the fact right before the cops took me, my uncle told me mum had told him she was really proud of me and the changes I was making the past week, this made my heart sink, because I didn't make any changes.&gt;Skip to jail time briefly, was in there for another month until my grandad bailed me, mum wouldn't take me home (no wonder why), and I spent the next three weeks at my grandads farm, I did farm work and this is when I started properly taking my antidepressants. After three weeks and a court visit, mum finally agreed to take me back, this was the happiest day of my life. After a few weeks living at home not really being able to do much, trying as hard as I can to resist all temptation, she gets me work experience at Mineworks Group[2] and after two weeks of that, the workshop manager told me he would really like it if I could come back after the holidays (time of wrk/exp was near Christmas) So, I came back as a TA (trades assistant) and kept at it for months, relapsing here and there (no big time drugs just having a session with mates now and again), and then people started saying I was getting lazy, less motivated, and looking tired all the time, I instantly gave it up, and made sure I was taking the antidepressants as I had missed a few days during the session times... After another month, work said they really liked my improvement and gave me an apprenticeship in heavy diesel mechanics. This was the greatest day of my life, even though I'm only earing 10/hr (which isn't bad, and working 8hrs a day 5 days a week, it adds up), I had finally did it, I got my dream job, for once in my shitty life I had achieved something.&gt;After a bit of saving, I bought myself a phone, which is something I haven't had in a very long time, so I decided to spoil myself with a Galaxy S4, and then later bought myself a car, (I'll post pictures in the comments after I've posted this) I got a Mitsubishi Triton MK 1998, brilliant condition, and a great car for $4500 (which my mum paid for half because I made such an improvement, but I still have to pay her back for it)&gt;So I guess that's my life story so far... If anyone has any questions about time periods I've missed out on while typing this go right ahead, AMA, don't think you'll offend me.&gt;Edit; sorry I forgot the TL;DR&gt;TL;DR 13 drug addict, 14 drug addict criminal, mixed with family troubles and me not taking meds, 15 everything doubled and became worse and then finally at 16 made my life changes and achieved something in lifeOP's background story. So what did you do that you might get arrested now? [info] None [info] 1394487308 [info] test
MyEngriish [info] I hate myself and my parents so much This probably isn't the place for this, but I really need somewhere to express my feelings.From the outside, my family looks perfect. A wife, a husband and 2 sons. Both parents are very succesful, and their sons are smart fellas, with decent looks, stepping on their parents footsteps, to one day take over the company. But that's all so wrong. We're completely broken apart. Or at least, I am. I wasn't always an only child. I come from a rich family. Growing up, I had everything. Until the age of 11, everything went.. fine. My parents weren't always there, but I had my twin with me. One day, we were playing, and my running came to a sudden stop at the top of the stairs. My brother who ran behind me, to catch me, didn't have time to stop, and he tripped on my leg as I suddenly turned around to face him. My back hit the wall, but he fell down the stairs. He was dead before reaching the bottom. The stairs are quite long, and the fall broke his neck. I cried. Jesus, I still cry to this day. Since the day of his funeral, nothing was the same. My parents became even more distant, and dug themselves deeper into work. I was left alone all the time, my only companions being my toys and pets. I was a wreck. I started smoking the ciggaretes my father had around the house at 12 years old. They noticed, but they didn't care. I was diagnosed with depression at that age. I have complete heterochromia, and one of my eyes is blue, the other one is brown, and it never affected me until that age. I started thinking that even if I was a bit different, it wasn't in a good way. I'd look at my eyes in the mirror and would either punch it, or the wall next to it. Even though they never said it I think my parents blame me for my brother's death. At 13, I avoided any human interaction, and only had one close friend. At 14, I had already gotten kicked out of 2 schools, and my parents hired teachers to homeschool me. At 15, I was still depressed, and became addicted to alchohol.  My parents still didn't care. They were always gone on bussiness trips. They'd leave me money, and they'd let me stay alone with my pets for days, sometimes even weeks. They were always there for my birthdays though, even though they weren't much fuss. At 16, I wasn't a virgin anymore, and accidentally left a girl pregnant, and I forced her to get an abortion, when she was 4 and a half months pregnant. We broke up afterwards. At 17, I was illegally drunk driving, not to mention I was underage, and caused a car crash. Nobody died, but the driver was left paralyzed from the waist down, and I never got in any trouble for it. My parents paid for it.It's my birthday today. I'm turning 18, and I'm sitting on my porch, with my dog Dante next to me. He looks at me and waggs his tail every now and then. He loves me no matter what. I'm drinking a glass of whiskey, and already smoked half of the pack that was full not long ago. My parents aren't here. They're on a trip to Spain. This is the first birthday that they missed. I'm thinking about what a horrible person I am. I blame myself for the death of my brother, paralyzed a man from waist down, and forced my ex to get an abortion, despite the dangers, but nothing ever happened to me. I tell everyone I'm fine, but I'm not. I don't wanna see a therapist. I don't like them. I'm a spoiled horrible asshole, with parent issues, and I know it. But I can't change. I simply am unnable to.And I do not think about suicide, no. No matter how horrible and deppressed I am, I don't have these kinds of thoughts. One look at me, and you wouldn't say I'm depressed. After all these years, I've mastered the art of putting a fake smile on whenever I need to. And despite the fact that I try, I can't go back to how I used to be before he died. I just sit here, listening to the calming rain and writting my feelings down for the world to see. Just so I can forget that they aren't here. And neither is he. [info] None [info] 1554994826 [info] test
ohAmygdala [info] I was diagnosed with depression a couple years ago and put on medication and went to a therapist at my  university. The therapist sent me to another therapist who I never met with because he kept changing our appointments around and cancelling, kind of makes it hard to trust any of them, but ive been in contact with another. Hopefully will have an appointment soon. Thank you for listening and the advice. [info] None [info] 1453695536 [info] test
kerkypasterino [info] I'm a complete failure I'm not sure if I'm actually gonna post this, I'll see how I feel when I finish writing.I'm a complete failure. I've never succeeded in anything in my life. I'm 19 and was a low achiever at school, to the point that I barely made out of it. The thing is, it's been this way throughout my entire life. Ever since kindergarden, I used to fail to do the most basic things, and that includes making friends. I mean, I had friends back in that time, or atleast I thought I had. Today I realize I was just an annoying kid who'd follow a couple classmates around while they told me to leave them alone/mocked me, bullied me, etc. That went on until I was 15, I think, when I realized what was happening and started changing and tried to make actual friends who'd actually want to be around me (in which I guess I succeeded, so there's that). However, the constant abuse that I received from those so called friends plus the expectations from my parents not being met (which lead to several fights at home) completely destroyed my self-esteem, that is non-existant nowadays. It was around this time that I was diagnosed with depression, but I refused to believe this and basically ignored the treatment for as long as I could.So I said that this kind of stuff happened up until I was 15. During that year, I failed school, and then switched schools to a new one where I made lots of friend. Well, probably not "lots", but for me it was a lot, since I never really had many friends. It was around this time that I met her. God, she was amazing. The coolest person I have ever met. After a few months of being extremely close friends, we started dating, and everything started going great, I was doing okayish in school (a lot thanks to her, she'd help me studying and what not), I was happy, my family was happy, I had a reason to keep going and to try my hardest. Then, one day she said she wasn't sure if she wanted to keep dating, and everything fell apart. She was in another city spending her vacation with her family, and I was working in our hometown. Everyday I'd call her and ask her to please not break up with me, and then she'd say that she was really tired of it all, and I' say that I'd change anything she wanted for one last chance. Then she'd say "Ok, one more chance." and that was it. This conversation happened the exact same way atleast 30 times, until one day she blocked me on Facebook, Whatsapp, Instagram and Snapchat, and I'd never hear from her again. I was crushed. I still am. Fast forward 2 months and she finally answered one of my calls, and right then and there we "officially" broke up. I think the hardest part was to hear that she never really loved me, and that all that was said and promised was a complete fucking lie.Summing up: The girl who was my best friend and girlfriend dumped me after spending 2 months without talking to me (or letting any sort of information about her get to me, essentialy).I tried to get my shit together, but I just can't. I've been on medication for almost a year now, whilst seeing a psychiatrist, but nothing seems to help. I started smoking weed, which was a great relief, and my parents are extremely disappointed with this. I think I never saw them so unhappy and just generally worned out by something. I've contemplated suicide a few times, but I'd never have the balls to do it. I'm a complete failure and disappointment to anyone I've ever loved, and I just wish I didn't feel this way anymore.Thanks for reading this, I guess. If anyone did read the whole thing, please leave a comment. It doesn't have to be anything big or whatever, it just comforts me to know that someone knows what I'm going through. [info] None [info] 1443100556 [info] test
slacker7 [info] &gt;The Tottenham full-back, 27, made the admission in a frank interview with several national newspapers.&gt;&gt;"It's no secret that I've been through a testing time at Tottenham this season," said Rose.&gt;&gt;"It led to me seeing a psychologist and I was diagnosed with depression, which nobody knows about."&gt;&gt;He added: "I haven't told my mum or my dad, and they are probably going to be really angry reading this, but I've kept it to myself until now."&gt;&gt;Rose said the treatment of a knee injury sustained in January 2017 - which saw him sidelined for eight months - was the start of a period of personal turmoil.&gt;&gt;"My uncle killed himself in the middle of my rehab, and that triggered the depression as well," Rose said.&gt;&gt;"Off the field there have been other incidents: back home in August my mum was racially abused in Doncaster. She was very angry and upset about it, and then someone came to the house and nearly shot my brother in the face - a gun was fired at my house.&gt;&gt;"England has been my salvation and I can't thank the manager and the medical staff enough. It was really hard, and being referred to a doctor and psychologist by the Spurs club doctor helped me massively to cope." [info]  [info] 1528354285 [info] test
8byfive [info] I need a friend I'm married.  I'm unemployed. My oldest daughter and I don't get along. I've lost my faith in God. I don't have any friends.  I've been diagnosed with depression (taking meds) and more recently I've found out I may have OCPD.I'm talking to a therapist.  My wife and I also go to therapy (our marriage is struggling).  I'm also reading "Rebuilding" by Bruce Fisher &amp; Robert Alberti.The first chapter says I need to find a friend to talk to as I work through the other chapters and rebuilding my life.Does anyone want to volunteer to be that friend?  If your working through your own struggles, we can talk about that too.  I can promise 100% confidentiality and expect the same.  We should feel comfortable telling each other the truth. If your in Tulsa MSA even better, we could perhaps meet for coffee once a month or something.I'm open to text, kik (anonymous) or even phone calls.  I would prefer a man, no offense ladies but I'm a guy and taking to a woman would just complicate things. [info] None [info] 1462215787 [info] test
RealFuzz [info] I think the question "do you get help for nihilism" is too complicated a question. While I've been diagnosed with depression I wouldn't say the reason for that is nihilism. When I am medicated I am still a nihilist, it just makes life bareable to the point where I can say say why not live my life instead of why bother.  [info] None [info] 1523122347 [info] test
Hibbieluv [info] I go outside. I was diagnosed with depression as a teen. Nature helps. A short walk or just a nap under a tree is like a bandaid for my spirit.  [info] None [info] 1490036938 [info] test
eizoop [info] I was diagnosed with depression in my mid-teens, and I just sought help this past December (I'm 25 now). I can't believe how much progress I've made just by having a therapist to talk to and having a low amount of medication every day. It certainly takes the edge off, which allows me to navigate through all my issues and emotions effectively and thoroughly. I wish I had listened to myself and close friends years ago when we said I should "just get help." [info]  [info] 1407878880 [info] test
bearthefuckdown [info] I was fired from my 7 year job, I don't know what to do. As the title says, I was fired from my retail job due to the inability to continue the line of work after several health issues.I was diagnosed with depression after being evaluated after a car accident. I was off work for about a month due to a severe concussion. When I came back to work I started to feel really "off", I found myself becoming more spacey and even the simplest of tasks became a challenge.I'm 25 years old with a bachelor's degree in political science. I initially had a good rainy day fund but after requiring some medical procedures for a various array of health issues I now find myself in about 18,000USD in debt, including my car. I do have a 401k with approximately 30,000 dollars vested into the account.I don't know where the next step is from here, has anyone been in a similar situation? [info] None [info] 1508744073 [info] test
ofthewest [info] It sounds like you're very depressed on top of your ADHD. I was diagnosed with depression long before ADHD because of all the reasons you list above. I agree with everyone in this thread re: negative self-talk. You are only making things harder on yourself by being so mean to yourself. It's VERY difficult to stop, though, and it's something that I have to work to be better at every day. The best ways to handle negative self-talk are CBT (try Feeling Good by David Burns) and going on an anti-depressant. Both together are really the best thing you can do, and I promise you you don't have to feel this way forever. [info] None [info] 1510026540 [info] test
roKUxx [info] I was in his position before I was diagnosed with depression.  It's also possible he has some imbalances and should see a doctor.   [info] None [info] 1543697833 [info] test
DeusNotExorior [info] It was a sudden realization.I always thought that I'm just sad, but once I started talking about my issues, and all of a sudden I'm diagnosed with depression and personality disorder.Felt good. [info] None [info] 1450744369 [info] test
HayateCero [info] Diagnosed/Had depression in the past, does this disqualify me from being a police officer? Hi! To make it short and simple, in the past around 17 I was diagnosed with depression and even before that I took medicine for ADHD in middle and high school, I also had an IEP. These things such as depression and ADHD(diagnosed as a kid) Aren’t prevalent nor do they affect my day to day life. It’s been almost 5 years since I’ve taken any type of meds for adhd or depression and things are fine with me now, does this still present a disqualifying factor to being an officer? Thank you!!! Sorry it wasn’t that short lol. [info] Civilian [info] 1553492440 [info] test
Juiceisgreat [info] I am diagnosed with depression and also have a lot of friends diagnosed with it (from group therapy). The best thing you can do is just listen to what they have to say when they do talk. If you want to say something about what she has to say, then try and relate to the situation shes talking about by telling her about the time you went through a similar situation and how you handled it.If shes depressed about something and doesn't want to talk about it, don't push her to talk about it or pester her to let it out. Just accept that she doesn't want to talk about whats troubling her and talk about something else. In terms of doing things, just get her some of her favourite things like chocolate or candy, maybe cook her favourite meal etc. Its the little things that will cheer her up the most. Just be patient and things will get better friend! [info] None [info] 1426105559 [info] test
Shiny-Zorua [info] For me, I was diagnosed with depression for 9 years. The pill they put me on was crap, and at the time, I was having insurance issues. I lost my doctor after my husband left the military, was unable to get my Lexapro pills anymore. I developed a hatred for them by then, they simply didn't work, and to have receptionists look at me like I was a druggie was infuriating. Going cold turkey from Lexapro was a nightmare for everyone and I was just miserable. There was an odd 'ahha' moment for me during this time when I remembered that I once read that ADHD was genetic. My brother has it, my mother is undiagnosed, but she also has it. What if it was ADHD? I actually prayed it was, because I didn't want to get back on Lexapro. I sought out a therapist (no easy task in a small town) and she confirmed it for me.Kinda funny how after I got diagnosed, both my parents (divorced) came out of the woodwork like 'oh that explains x in your childhood'. Actually pissed me off quite a lot. They were so focused on my brother who has a wide variety of mental issues that no one so much as bothered looking at me when the signs were obvious.  [info] None [info] 1489511518 [info] test
Lordbine [info] I took this to see as I have been diagnosed with depression for six years or so. A lot of times this only tests are really bad but this one a actuallyslly seemed decent.One thing I must say is if you tested for something on this please get help but for god sake, don't go to a doctor saying an online test says I have bi-polar or depression as doctors hate Dr google. (You'd be surprised how many people do this)Just be honest and try to be open, it takes a long ass time to open up to doctors and all, just recently I have opened up about different things to my psychiatrist  and that's after 6 years of seeing a psychiatrist.But truly get help as it can make a world of difference. (Sorry for format posting on mobile) [info] None [info] 1546725732 [info] test
steph_c1 [info] I am diagnosed with depression. It is NOT an excuse for treating people you love like shit.  [info] None [info] 1507797916 [info] test
ritaorabri [info] Depression relapse? When I was 15 I was diagnosed with depression and admitted to a hospital for long-term care. Fast forward three years, I was first medicated for my depression and continued to be medicated for another year and a half. As I began my first year at college, the change of environment helped tremendously and felt as though I didn't have to take the medication anymore. I spoke to my doctor and she agreed that she felt that I could reduce my dosage to minimal, then eventually none.I am now in my fourth year at college and have found this past semester more difficult than ever. It's strange because I feel stronger since I am not reacting as severely as I used to (frequently crying, loss of interests in activities), but I feel completely alone and as if I want to always hide. I struggle opening up to people because I don't want them to judge me, I've always cared what people thought but this has become so chronic that it's consuming my life and ruining already existing relationships as well as preventing me from making new ones. I'm having a hard time finding a purpose, losing interest in spending time with other people and want to be alone. All of the time. My family is concerned and I miss them, but can't bring myself to really want to talk to anyone.I don't know if any of that makes sense, but I'm in a really dark and confusing place right now. [info] None [info] 1463277967 [info] test
vurvela_ [info] "I swear to God that I don't think I can go another day." I feel tired of everything, I can not continue more and more and more often I feel like the life is finishing me.I want them to see me happy, but there comes a point where I can not have been 7 painful years since I cut myself for the first time until 3 months ago that I was diagnosed with depression and borderline personality disorder, have been long days.Because of this, I have alienated people I love deeply, have been years that I do not understand how they can improve, years in which I have hurt innumerable people, where I have hurt myself, in less than a week I will turn 19 and I have Fear, fear of failure, fear of believing. Fear of losing myself more and more, afraid of getting to the point where my illness overcomes me. But sometimes I must confess that he becomes bigger than I, he becomes much more serious than I still seem to start, sometimes I just want to cut my arms until all the memories come to me.I do not know how I can find myself, but I am sure that if something does not change if some of this does not disappear I will die in life. To fulfill 19 years terrifies me, I know that no one imporata it to fulfill that age, a few people care, but I really hope to overcome this, I do not want to get to the point of filling my body with new scars. I am sorry to harm my parents and my relatives, but I am drowning in my pains and thoughts. Even at age 19 I look like a little girl lying in bed with some pain, but this time the depression turned to physical pain, a sadness that bites me. Maybe this could change [info] None [info] 1498273299 [info] test
fuglywugly [info] Warning - This is a rant. **tl;dr** https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=glvdySoLkMkI am so done. Just. Done. Last summer I was diagnosed with depression. Big woop. you know, it only took the fact that I *masturbated* ever since I was *born* literally doing it until I fell asleep in the car seat. Oh but that should just go away on it's own because it is *normal*. If it does not go away and the child is already in grade school this is beyond what any parent should have to deal with. The school counselor should be called. Oh, actually why don't we fucking make that the entire board of teachers? And, even after the parents decide to let the bloody CHILD who is only SIX YEARS OLD decide what TREATMENT SHE WANTS the school is going to go behind the parents back and continue to have "therapy sessions" and just tell the other kids that this is happening because the little girl is *different*. &amp;nbsp;The little girl begs mummy not to go to school every day. She learns how to make herself throw up to avoid all the laughter. She learns how to hide things. She hears adults murmuring sexual abuse and decides to look up what sex is...in third grade. She learns all sorts of awful things and tries a few of them. This is how an oxygen deprivation (choking) addiction is born. She doesn't tell anyone because who is there left to trust?&amp;nbsp;There were signs from early on that something was wrong. What child doesn't want people to watch her when she plays? What child spends as much time alone as possible? What child has satanic dreams and is convinced that anything with black eyes is going to steal her soul? What child wakes up screaming in the middle of the night and muffles her screams in the pillow because eventually the fear of disappointing mum and dad is greater than the nightmares?&amp;nbsp;The Miss Populars decide that the kid should be there new little toy. They invite her into their group and make her feel special. She has to stop hanging out with her neighbor though, because he is a boy and that's just weird. She has to get contacts, they bring out her eyes. Aeropostale is what she has to wear, just so they can all look alike. She can't eat that much, because no one likes people who look like a pig. Oh, and her new nickname is Lucy. She asks what that means and May says it's short for Lucifer. She doesn't know what that means and happily smiles, glad to be included. Later she finds out what that means, and that she can't hang out with the cool people anymore because their parents think there's something wrong with her. &amp;nbsp;Back when the girl was three she asked her parents if they lied, and they said no. Later on that year she is screaming from one of her nightmares but no one comes. She gets up and wanders out into the kitchen. She then sees "Santa Claus". She asks and her parents say Santa isn't real. Neither is the tooth fairy...She tells her preschool class about this and everyone cries. She gets sent home with a pretty letter and has to go somewhere else. Mother and Father tell her that sometimes you don't tell people things. She doesn't understand and begins to become quieter and quieter. Later on that year they buy a black cat. The black cat scares the little girl but her mum won't get rid of it. One night it bites her while she is asleep. She screams and her mum blames her for pulling the cat's tail. The girl hates the cat. She begins to break out in hives and turn blue. The mum takes her and just says they're going for a trip. They go to a hospital. The girl asks what's going on and she is told everything will be fine. The girl doesn't believe her, what if she is just saying that like when the girl wasn't supposed to tell people about Santa? The girl begins to cry and becomes upset. The mum is angry, the girl doesn't know why. The mum says she is scared and to be quiet. Another women comes in with lots of needles and tubes. The girl keeps crying until the mum says she will make her take a nose mask unless she is quiet. The girl is shocked and says nothing. The mask is fitted over her face and the girl becomes numb. She can't sleep all night and is given a remote. At first the mum is careful and makes sure to watch what her daughter sees. Then the mum falls asleep and the girl begins to flip channels. She continues until morning and sees several interesting shows. In the morning she wakes her mum up when she sees daylight. Her throat hurts but she is scared of the lady with the nose mask so she doesn't say anything.&amp;nbsp;The girl tries to hide her asthma. She stops taking her medicine when she does something wrong to "punish" herself. She tries getting straight A's but the allowance of money isn't what she wants. She tries taking her mums sleep pills at night but they make her feel funny during the day. She tries being good and bad but nothing seems to work. She is friends with the outcasts, the popular kids, she joins sports, she tries a lot but nothing helps. Books become her best friend. When she reads she can pretend like she is someone else. The library and the computer lab are her favorite places to hide. &amp;nbsp;She lies about trying to commit suicide just to see if her parents would care. They just get angry. They don't understand and tell her she has everything she wants. She goes to counseling and talks to someone. The first three people tell her they can't handle her. One threatens to call child abuse on her parents and have her put in a hospital. She tries talking to someone but just becomes more confused. Then she sees a gossip from her town going to the therapist and leaves.&amp;nbsp;Her parents throw things at her. They move. They buy her a horse. They buy her a Kindle. They repaint her room. They get her flute lessons. They buy her clothes and more clothes. They get her laptops, phones, video games, books, a new dog, a cat, but the girl doesn't really want any of it. She shrugs it away. Her parents tell her she is rude and other girls wouldn't do this. Other girls would be grateful. She should get a job, her cousin is working AND going to college full time. She should be nicer, their neighbors daughter is on the student council, gets straight A's, works, and has an adopted brother...She should be _______ because ________ is ______. &amp;nbsp;The little girl is mean towards them, because getting yelled at at least let's her feel something. Her mother says she is a bitch. The boys at school tells her she is a whore. Her friends say she is serious, sad, and mopey. Soon everyone slowly leaves and she is all alone. People tell her to buck up and others are starving in the world. She has everything she ever wanted. She starved herself for a while and decided she wouldn't mind switching places with someone. &amp;nbsp;The little girl isn't really little. She is seventeen years old. That little girl is me. I switched to talking about myself in the third person because it is easier to describe things that way, makes it feel less real. I don't know if anything even is wrong. I just don't know anymore. &amp;nbsp;I tried turning to food for comfort, and just made me feel worse. Now I'm sad and fat. Plus my mum went out after she got mad and bought a bunch of food with peanuts in it. (I am allergic to all nuts.) Literally there are no carbs in the house that I can eat now. (Did you know they make peanut flour?) And I became a vegetarian for health reasons soo....XD. Guess I will be losing that weight. Whelp I am doing what every other teenager does when they are sad and feel lonely. Turning to the internet! Yeah! I just don't know what to do. &amp;nbsp;I thought about it, what I want is someone to just give me a hug and say I love you. Then maybe go on a walk with me once a week or so. Just someone who wants to hang out. Someone who will just listen to me, and tell me I'm not crazy, or depressed, or a monster, or selfish...or a bitch when I haven't had sex with anyone ever. I also haven't turned to alcohol or drugs although I have no idea why! Well my family is crazy annoyed by me, my friends all secretly hate me because I am "sad" all the time and don't want to hang out with me. My family's solution is to throw stuff at me whenever they feel guilty. I picked up cooking to take my mind off stuff and try and help not be so "selfish" because both my parents work but my mum pitched a fit when I made pork chops one night and chicken another because she had something else in mind. It is also always about me even though I am not even eating meat?? &amp;nbsp;She gets mad when I don't talk, and when I do talk she got mad at me because I said something that didn't pertain to the conversation. She gets mad when I don't do horse chores in the morning and gets mad when I do because it's her "alone time". She is angry that I don't have a job when I've been applying but continues to pay for a car/gas/insurance when I've asked her to stop because it is unnecessary when I don't have a job. She gets mad when I stay in the house and gets mad when I leave. I can't do anything right ever. I don't even know anymore...I just don't know. Mostly I think I am exhausted. I wish feelings had an on and off button. That would be nice. And I just want a friend. [info] None [info] 1424048377 [info] test
ManTheWombat [info] I've been looking for somewhere to share my gratitude as well, guess this'll do.When I was a little younger, I was diagnosed with depression and it fucking sucked for a long long time. Since I was spending a lot of time in my room for a large portion of each day, one of my main sources of escape ended up being the Yogscast, who I discovered through the Survival Island series. They allowed me to laugh for a little part of my day and get away from school and all the other stuff going on in my life. Slowly, my depression evaporated because of a few aspects that made me actually happy, and watching and discovered the Yogscast was definitely one of them. So thanks, guys, for helping to pull me through a really tough part of my life. I'll always feel like a part of this dysfunctional, weird-ass family. [info] Duncan [info] 1441236398 [info] test
SleepyIII [info] The reason I ask is this-- I was diagnosed with depression in 2001 and put on Effexor (before they came out with Effexor XR.) I was 20 at the time. I had never had any symptoms of narcolepsy or cataplexy, nor did I have a history of depression, but I had just gone through a fairly traumatic experience that resulted in the depression and what my doc considered a form of PTSD. When I would miss a pill, I would have withdrawal symptoms that came in the form of brain buzz. This brain buzz is identical to what happens right before I have a severe cataplexy attack, not the type that is triggered by emotional response and results in loss of muscle tension, but the type that comes in the form of instant onset of sleep paralysis. It is like a hot electrical wire being intermittently plugged directly into the top of my brain at 2 second intervals, then one second, then half a second, and so on until it is one solid buzz and I am completely paralyzed but still partially conscious. I don't think it is a coincidence that the same mechanism that is triggered in the brain that causes the buzz, and resulting sleep paralysis-- whatever that mechanism is-- is exactly the same. I believe that taking Effexor altered my brain in such a way that when I decided to go off of it-- or when I would miss a pill-- that mechanism was triggered. This is not to say that I did not have a genetic predisposition to have narcolepsy or cataplexy, of that I am not sure, but I am the only one in my family with it. But I do believe that taking Effexor was the catalyst for cataplexy symptoms to occur. [info] None [info] 1522043451 [info] test
trapped_ [info] Mood cycling? I was diagnosed with depression last year and I've been on celexa since then. It helped with my mood a lot at first but now I don't know. I feel okay in the mornings and then at some point in the day my mood just crashes - if I'm at home I'll just sit and cry or if I'm working I have to fight with myself not to. I get all the usual "what's the point in life, I'm never going to escape" sort of thoughts.The weird thing is that after an hour or so of this "crash" I feel fine/happy again and think positively about life etc. Is this normal? [info] None [info] 1295601718 [info] test
UrbanMonkeyWarfare [info] Personally, I think the biggest problem is that the only one who can truly "diagnose" and understand the individual form of depression in a patient is the patient himself. The "outside-perspective" of this illness is not sufficient for an accurate diagnosis but too few patients understand themselves and take charge of their mental health.Doctors first choice always seems to be SSRIs, although they only treat a specific kind of depression and can cause a lot of harm if applied wrongly.I'm diagnosed with depression myself, but as a very self-reflecting person who is interested in psychology, the workings of my own brain and their effects on my perception, I probably have a far better understanding of the situation than most patients - and possibly doctors who never experienced the inner view of depression. They are essentially guessing.I knew from the beginnings that SSRIs would not help be, but that I needed a DNRI. Still, the doctor wanted to test a SSRI first, and so we did. It made my symptoms worse (not feeling any emotions mostly), so I canceled the treatment ASAP. Now I got a DNRI prescribed, am doing much better and have a new perspective on life.If I would not have taken the direction of my treatment into my own hands, I doubt my treatment would have gone well. [info] None [info] 1471969685 [info] test
Jmus792 [info] I'm not sure about your interests and skill set, but have you considered meeting with a temp agency? Temp positions can be easier to secure initially and a great way to get started at a company if you're looking for something outside of retail. To answer the "What job is good for someone with CD" question, I find that the more online/working remotely friendly jobs can be great. I work for a website, and while being in the office is ideal, I can still get my work done from home on days that I don't feel up to coming into the office. If you're able to score a full time desk job, the health insurance and disability benefits are a huge help. I know this disease can be quite literally shitty, but try not to let it get the best of you. I was diagnosed with depression five years ago after my worst flair left me feeling socially isolated, insecure and hopeless. I saw a therapist who gave me some good coping strategies. I cope by attending a local support group. It is so great to speak with people who better understand what I'm going through and have similar experiences. Yoga and meditation have helped to relax my mind and improve my stress-induced symptoms. Ultimately, I try to focus on what I can do instead of what I can't do (i.e. I don't feel good enough to run but I can take a walk, I can't work a physically demanding job but I have good computer skills) and play to my strengths. I hope that helps!  [info] C.D. Remicade [info] 1494950930 [info] test
naughtydonkey [info] I've been diagnosed with depression for 5 years now, and when I found [this](http://imgur.com/jSN4CHy).. I don't know. To me, it's an exact description. [info] None [info] 1380448942 [info] test
ddixonr [info] I feel like this guy. Although, while I'm worse in that I can't keep a job for more than three months, I do a little more than he's described doing with the kids. I only have one toddler-aged girl, but I still relate. Once the wife gets home, I do tend to get lazier with my daughter. I've been diagnosed with depression, and have tried therapy and meds, but neither took. The therapy went well, but I eventually needed to take a job and they don't have a whole lot of non-business-hours appointments. I would say that you should plan more events, social things with the entire family. Get him to work harder with the kids while you're all together, and hopefully it leads to improvement all around. [info] None [info] 1298863808 [info] test
psychotiki [info] Hey there. I'm so sorry you're going through this, and that you feel so alone. The first thing I'll say is that there are thousands, if not millions, of people who feel the same way. I often feel as lost and alone as you do, and I often feel as if I'm losing it. I've had thoughts of giving up, so many times. Feeling worthless is something I have to fight every day. I was diagnosed with depression a few years back, and have been picking myself up ever since. It's hard, and it seems hopeless and never ending, but there are ways out of what you're in. But you can't do it alone. You need support. If not from your family, then from a professional, but preferably both. You sound extremely confused, and I think you would benefit a GREAT DEAL by going and talking to someone (a professional, not just a friend). It does sound like you have some worrying symptoms, but so does most of the world's population, that's the problem with the diagnostic system, almost anyone can qualify for almost any metal disorder. So be wary of self-diagnosis. It could be that because you are unable to talk to anybody and work through all of these thoughts and feelings in a healthy and adaptive way, things are getting exaggerated and confused inside your mind, which is not a good place to be. It could also be that you're seeing the early stages of a psychotic disorder. There is only one way to find out, and that's to go see a therapist or psychiatrist and get yourself properly checked out. Just out of curiosity, why don't you want to talk to your family? How is your relationship with them?Are there any metal health professionals you can speak to? Maybe a school counsellor?  [info] None [info] 1448969440 [info] test
beauty_from_pain [info] You're definitely not alone. My Nmom did the same thing. She also threatened to take me to a mental institution and leave me behind when I was diagnosed with depression at 13.I'm sorry you went through this. It's emotional abuse and no child should ever be told that they will be abandoned if they do not behave. [info] DoNP [info] 1418856958 [info] test
rabbitrainbows [info] I think it's all correlated? I was diagnosed with depression 4 years ago, then adhd-pi 2 years ago and surprise surprise, narcolepsy 2 weeks ago. I assume if I had decent sleep and didn't feel like garbage during the daytime, I would've dealt with my issues during the time of depression much better. I would've been less passive, indecisive, and have more confidence/energy. Because I was so tired all the time, I procrastinated dealing with my problems which made them drag on and the self loathing increased. I honestly think my depression really resolved after I got diagnosed with adhd-pi and the meds (+ consistent therapy) helped give me the energy to tackle my issues. &amp;#x200B;Ironically, during the initial chat with my sleep specialist was confident I DON'T have adhd-pi, but the narcolepsy caused my adhd-pi behaviors lol. The medication I took for adhd-pi also works for narcolepsy tho, so yeah.&amp;#x200B;I'm surprised you sleep specialist didn't want to give you a test, it's much easier/straight forward imo to test for narco than depression. The only drawback is the test was really expensive.. but if you think your case might be a sleep issue, i'd push harder for a test. Good luck! [info] None [info] 1559680587 [info] test
Zorocan [info] You're college advisors? you mean academic advisors?In any case, if they're professionals, I think it's pretty safe to tell them about your mental condition. I know this from personal experience since I am diagnosed with depression and is currently in college.  [info] None [info] 1450068113 [info] test
Chillin_at_Work_ [info] Thank you for this. I am 12 days in. I thought I was over the hard cravings but yesterday was really rough for me. My problem has been the depression. I did not expect the depression to be this intense. I have been diagnosed with depression earlier in my life and have had it managed for years now, but this depression was unexpected and crazy. I also have lost close to 80lbs in the last 9 months and have gained almost 10 since I quit which is making me extremely pissed off because I know how hard the last 10 lbs was to lose. I feel like I can not be losing weight and quitting smoking at the same time. But this post helps a lot. Just waiting for the depression to start getting better. Thinking about going to see someone about it. Partially for the mental health aspect but also to see if there are any recommendations he has about how to replace my eating when i have cravings to something else or just a healthier way to deal with all of this. Thank you again and you are an inspiration and role model for me right now.  [info] 42 days [info] 1496412342 [info] test
ezraxcore [info] I was diagnosed with depression a month ago. I started taking Sertraline. It kinda worked i guess? The only problem is that I cant feel emotion that much. Im better off like this than being overwhelmed and wanting to kill myself. Also, my mother is my strength. If you need someone to talk to, OP, you can send me a PM. [info] None [info] 1521385417 [info] test
polarisnico [info] I'm just gonna say it: Being that judgemental won't help a person out, who considers rehoming their puppy. In fact, your tone will raise the frustration in people that already take rehoming into consideration and make it more likely. I have 3 dogs, one of which is a puppy, and every time puppy blues hit me pretty hard. I'm good at dogs. I'm well-informed. I know they're work. But: A puppy almost always takes a part of your freedom and it's always easier said than done - that's why so many things in life fail. I've been stripped of my freedom two times now and it was messy; I'm diagnosed with depression so even worse for me. If you never felt what true helplessness felt like, you will at the moment you sit in front of a puppy with massive diarrhea at 3 AM when you just got home from late shift and have to work early shift (6 AM) the next morning. You will feel like shit and overwhelmed at work when you didn't sleep. You will consider rehoming at least a dozen times when frustration hits damn hard - but considering does not mean acting out on it. Every little thing that's a step forward nullifies a month's worth of consideration and frustration and makes it better. When my first puppy didn't go potty for a day because he was stubborn and shat and pissed all over the place, when he kept me awake the same night - I asked myself if this was worth it. When I checked his crate and saw, how bad he felt upon doing what he just did, I knew he understood. I was disgruntled, cleaned it al up, went to sleep for an hour and he did the same thing again. He barked at every little sound. But when he fell asleep in my lap the next day for the first time it was all worth it. The night before I always told myself I'd rehome him tomorrow. Never did it. It's been a good one and a half year.  [info] Owner of 3 :ExpOwnerBlack: (Chihuahua adult &amp; BMD puppy) [info] 1547189056 [info] test
PorcupinArseIHateYou [info] Already seeing one, I've been diagnosed with depression, I dunno if it's getting better [info] None [info] 1534273420 [info] test
jakalan7 [info] Career Burnout? Evening all, &amp;#x200B;I've worked super hard all my life (well, officially since I was 16) But I'm 25 now and I'm somewhat burnt out.&amp;#x200B;I've had a really good career in IT, working my way up from tech support to an IT Manager, picking up a lot of certifications along the way - however I resigned from my management position a couple months ago and took some time off to enjoy the fruits of my labours (I went to Japan, then America and generally enjoyed life).&amp;#x200B;There were a lot of reasons behind this, firstly a friend of mine died, we had been pretty close and had a sort of on/off relationship last Summer (she was only 22) and it hit me that I could die tomorrow too and I wanted to do some living instead of working in an office all day. Secondly, I was exhausted all the time - I barely had any energy to go out in the evenings and I'd lost all respect for my boss who unfortunately had really bad personal hygiene and would often speak to me as if I was a dog and/or a child.&amp;#x200B;Anyway I recently ran out of money and was forced to look at other IT jobs, so I've taken a job doing technical support (well below my previous pay grade) and to be honest it's pretty awful so far, the hours are long (08:30 - 17:30) and they have a ridiculous on call system which means you can basically be called on your personal mobile at any time (even if you aren't on call) I've been woken up by automated 'server alerts' at 6 am about 3 times this week.&amp;#x200B;I find when I get stressed and/or I'm being overworked I'll become ill, my throat swells up and I'll be incredibly fatigued. This is exactly what's happened this week and I've had to take 2 days off sick - I've still not fully recovered but I have to go back in tomorrow. I didn't get ill once on my 2 month break, but as soon as I go back into this job I'm ill again (this has been a reoccurring pattern for the last few years) &amp;#x200B;I'm just at a huge crossroads right now, do I even want a career in IT any more? I have little or no interest in doing any more IT exams right now, but I'm not sure if it's just a phase or not. &amp;#x200B;Or have I just burnt out, is this why I'm exhausted and demotivated all the time? &amp;#x200B;**Additional Info:**  \- I was diagnosed with depression about 18 months ago but I've stopped taking my medication, I feel like it turns me into a zombie and doesn't actually treat the root cause of the issue.   \- I broke up with my girlfriend of 5 years last year (we lived together for 2 of those years) to be honest it had just gone really flat and I didn't feel the same way that she felt about me. After the breakup my depression improved significantly and I seemed to have more energy again - but it's sort of returned a bit now.  I'm seeing another girl now but it's not super-serious because to be honest I'm afraid of commitment.   \- I own my house so my outgoings are minimal (perhaps £400 a month tops)  so I could probably take a part time job and still get by - this isn't something I've done before but it's definitely an option.   \- One of my main hobbies is DJ'ing and promoting events, some months I can make up to £500 from doing this alone. I often fantasise about doing this full time. I am passionate about this but I am full of self doubt and I'm not sure I can turn this into a career. [info] None [info] 1560105298 [info] test
AndypandyO [info] Should I say I was depressed? I'm currently applying for AAC Ground Crew. I'm very early in the application stage and one of the top questions is, "have you been or are you diagnosed with depression?" I am not diagnosed with it nor do I have any symptoms of it. However, about a year and a half ago I went through a very messy break up and thought I was depressed for a period of about 2 months or more. I went to the doctor, said I was depressed so he threw some anti depressants my way. I did not take any anti depressants and completely willed my way back to health and to a stable state of mind. Since then I have never felt any slight depression what so ever. But the question is, do I say I was diagnosed with depression?Cheers. [info] None [info] 1477039644 [info] test
ConstantRadio [info] How do I know whether I truly dislike my job or it's just mental illness giving me false perception? Been fired or did quit few engineering jobs so far and seeing contract terminated always gave me good feeling and a relief. Otherwise for the whole day I am looking on a watch for that 5PM so I can go home, I pretend that I am working, it takes a lot of mental effort to start tasks (depending on mood - sometimes I even can't open email), while finishing them is like trying to move a mountain, I'm not interested in interacting with coworkers especially talking about work...in short I am like some tourist visiting a company with a very poor productivity. So far I was diagnosed with depression to a high extend, and with ADD to a lower extend.&amp;#x200B;&amp;#x200B;EDIT: Some more info for you guys (sorry if sounds a bit techy, as it was written for techies on first place):&gt;Since my electronics engineering studies and even since my technical high school days, deep down in me I am asking myself, whether electrical engineering (or software development tasks - it's pretty much the same thing due to problem solving nature) is really something that I want to do, leaving a good pay, market demand and social status aside? High school was somewhat terrible, while university was more bearable as I wasn't forced in doing anything and everything was very individual. Uni was hard and at the same time a complete boredom, but somehow, with a lot of luck, I managed to pass it by doing learning campaigns few days before exams while having a lot of help from colleagues. Of course, the grades were an utter garbage, but at the end of the day the boat was floating, although there were some close calls to drop out the uni (as a side note, I live in a social country with "free" education, so fooling around in school is possible without ending with a big dept). During practice work on uni, professors occasionally caught me being mentally absent, and had advised me that it's better for me to go for a walk in a park rather than daydreaming during their lessons. Few times assistants warned me that in essence I don't have the capability to perform engineering tasks, while other colleges told me in face or behind by back that I am a dumb moron. They might be right, but at the same time it makes me wonder, if that's true, how the hell did I make it so far - it can not be all luck, or is it?  &gt;  &gt;Now the job. The best part of it is going home and often it takes an eternity in waiting for that 5 o'clock. I can barely start tasks, and finishing them is a major challenge. Often I just pretend that I am working or I keep doing some completely irrelevant tasks. My productivity is low and my manager already warned me about it. Then I am not interested in talking with coworkers, especially not about work-related topics. On team meetings I have very hard time to stay on focus with discussion, usually I just sail away with my thoughts. On few occasions I've heard from coworkers that "this guy is a dumbass", "he doesn't know what he is talking about" I was said straight in face that "we need to have someone who CAN think" so there has to be something about all this stuff. I think that so far I excelled only in simple linear scripting (e.g. programming steps for automation), but I usually got lost in anything more complex that requires an actual problem solving. I never finished any app design. Some employer even suggested me, to maybe consider graphic design. So far I had quit or been fired at few jobs, all in the engineering field, and every contract termination made me happy. Not sure if I ever got any interest in any of those jobs, aside from money and status.  &gt;  &gt;And then my hobby, which should be game development. I yet have to finish a single game, because I've only ended with dozens of half working prototypes. When I am developing a game, I tend to somehow get stuck in coding. Often I just keep staring in that code for a longer time, not moving anywhere. Finally, I somehow stop coding and end with doing graphical work, composing music, googling or playing around with tabs in browser...in short, I end doing some irrelevant stuff instead of continuing with game development. I believe that from all the tasks that I can do, programming takes me the most of time (too much of it) and brings no results. [info] None [info] 1543256980 [info] test
applebreadsticks [info] My life fell apart and I'm so heartbroken my body is breaking down Hi reddit. I'm (17F) struggling a lot to type this out, and have been since it happened even though I know I'll feel better after sharing it. I'm going to do a very very short version of The Downfall, and then maybe come back to elaborate when I feel like I can. Right now I truly just need to get this off my chest.I've been wanting to post on here for a while, but I've been struggling to communicate my feelings and haven't been able &amp;#x200B;I was diagnosed with depression a few weeks ago, before everything fell apart. Ergo I'm feeling pretty low already. Friday night I found out my grandmother and father both have cancer. My grandmother is close to dying and my father hasn't gotten the 'final results' yet, so his fate is currently unknown. I'm not very close with either of them, but it still hit me very hard as I don't have a lot of family left. I didn't tell anyone about it really, including my boyfriend, who cluelessly broke up with me about three hours later. I've been in relationships before, but never one as serious as this one, and he meant (means) the world to me. He simply just fell out of love. He was my biggest supporter and I've never confided in and trusted another person as I have him, so losing him also meant losing my best friend. I feel incredibly alone, and I don't recall when I last felt a pain like this. Since friday night I can count on one hand what I've eaten, I've been drinking a lot of alcohol to numb it all a bit, and now my body seems to be trying to tell me a thing or two. I woke up last night covered in my own blood experiencing the worst breakthrough bleeding in my life (i'm also on the pill, so this should not happen), am still bleeding heavily, which is scary. My hair is falling out in chunks, my skin is breaking out, I have excoriations around my eyes from crying, I cannot sleep, and my depression seems to have doubled in severity. Oh, and I also had a terrible pregnancy scare from two inconclusive tests this Monday. I can't believe my life was fine literally a week ago. I feel so lost and alone and see no hope for the future at all.&amp;#x200B;**Tl;dr: Was diagnosed with depression a few weeks ago. My boyfriend/best friend/biggest support broke up with me on the same night I found out my grandmother and father have cancer. Since then I have been unable to eat, drink, or sleep properly, and now I'm experiencing heavy breakthrough bleeding, acne, hairloss, and even worse depression. Also had a pregnancy scare, and now I am losing hope.** [info] None [info] 1550761683 [info] test
PickleballTrophies [info] How do you deal with social exclusion? To preface this: I stopped drinking in 2012 when I was 18. I'm 22 now, and am happy with my decision to live a life of complete sobriety when there is so much alcoholism and prescription drug abuse in my family. That being said, I can't help but wonder how different my life would be if I'd chosen to live by today's social norms. I have never, felt that I'm treated equally when it comes to social interactions, or specifically, being invited out/to parties.Now, I don't have a problem with others drinking. At all. I stopped drinking because I lacked any control over myself/my consumption, but I don't expect others to abide by my own lifestyle. I would love to at least be invited out to bars to feel like others don't look at me like I'm some kind of circus freak, but that has never happened.I'm sure people do it because they are just trying to be courteous to my life choices, but it's led me to this mentality that others will always, always have more fun and enjoy themselves when im not around. I've had to delete all of my social media because seeing others constantly enjoying themselves while I'm at home alone has absolutely destroyed me. I was diagnosed with depression 5 years, and have been on antidepressents for the past 3 months, but this incessant feeling that I'm a boring, depressed outkast seen by others as an eternal afterthought rather than someone they look forward to seeing never seems to leave.Thank you, Reddit, for being the one place I feel comfortable and free to discuss the thoughts I get caught up in and live inside of everyday. [info] None [info] 1475985176 [info] test
dogsandcupcakes [info] I will try the shake! It makes me feel better to hear that someone else has a similar schedule and situation as me. I have been diagnosed with depression and have mostly accepted the "fake it until you make it" approach. My mom passed away and she was very understanding of mental illness; but my dad is absolutely not understanding at all and doesn't even believe in it. He is the one who pushes the fake it approach onto me so heavily...I will get blood work done at my next doctor appointment to double check everything again.I am kind of lonely. I am around people all day but I do not have any significant, in person, connection. I am rather introverted and do not appreciate small talk, so I crave a deeper connection with one or two people. However, I call myself a "socially skilled" introvert because I can easily adapt to any social situation but I definitely do not usually enjoy it lol.  [info] None [info] 1509030948 [info] test
notludwigvan [info] run of the mill depression or something else? I've been diagnosed with depression and GAD in the past, mostly through my teens and early twenties. I've never taken medication for it besides an occasional xanax for airplanes or panic attacks. I'll usually have a depressive spiral, 2 or 3 days where I can't get out of bed and cry, every few months but nothing that really affects my day-to-day experience. But lately, my panic attacks are getting far more regular. Like one every week almost. I'm finding myself easily overstimulated by people and noise. I'm starting to feel like I'm disassociating, thinking I'm in purgatory and that I've lived my life more than once. Like, actually unhinged thoughts. When I go out with friends, I just look at everyone like they're already old or dead. I'm constantly living in the past or the future. I don't enjoy my hobbies, it's hard to create anything anymore. My memory has gone to shit and it's difficult to measure time. My thoughts are loud, disorganized, and blown way out of proportion (like it might start with me being worried about a bill and in the course of a few minutes I'm sobbing over climate change and every animal that's ever suffered and every horror that's ever happened). My symptoms are becoming nonsensical and honestly hard to deal with. I've been gaslighting myself about it but it's getting impossible to ignore. I'm also becoming somewhat of a hypochondriac and feel like everything is a serious problem and I'm in my late 20s so I'm getting scared I might develop schizophrenia or something. I don't know. Any input by someone who relates would be sincerely appreciated. [info] None [info] 1558645248 [info] test
Pzora [info] Difficulty moving forward Lost my father 7 months ago suddenly to a heart attack, he passed alone in his room next to mine. Our relationship was never perfect but I love my dad and his death broke my heart.Most days I try to keep my mind off those who have been lost, but most nights, like tonight, it pains me deeply to remember the stupid little squabbles or annoyances that were common between us. I'm still reliving the night I found him slouched over in his chair, knowing before I even touched his cold body that he was gone.Unfortunately (in my opinion) I'm not religious of any sort, telling myself he is with my mother again and family that has passed, sadly doesn't do anything for me. The only solace I have is he no longer has to suffer from his depression and other mental demons. Not even sure if this is where I should be posting this, I was diagnosed with depression by the age of 9 (now 28) and it has been a long battle. Losing arguably the closest person to me  has left a wound that feels like it could never heal.Thanks for reading my wall of text reddit, I tried to keep it short. [info] None [info] 1550396303 [info] test
lythalive [info] I was diagnosed with depression and GAD at 17. I took it ok, it was not unexpected. I was rediagnosed at 37 with AvPD, Depression, severe Social Anxiety, General Anxiety, PTSD, slight Agoraphobia and a light sprinkling of Paranoia. I knew things had gotten bad over the years but that diagnosis messed me up for a couple of months. It made me feel pathetic and like a human who got warped along the way and needed to be trashed. Too far gone.I'm working very hard on my self esteem at the moment. I feel like I'm working from the bottom up. [info] None [info] 1526054733 [info] test
RainbowBrittle [info] I feel you. My mom started out being really resistant to drugging and psychological diagnoses. She and my dad disagreed about me getting tested for ADD back in the day. My (clueless) teachers didn't think I needed it, and they were supposed to be the experts--but also, my mom was vehemently opposed to me being labeled "deficient." (This may have also been due to fears that it would exacerbate racial discrimination, as we are black Americans.) When I was diagnosed with depression later (mainly because I couldn't get shit done), she was very fearful that I'd have to be on antidepressants forever, and asked when I could stop taking them. Then, in the course of followup treatments for depression, my ADD was finally diagnosed. I didn't stay on meds for long back then (college), probably because the dosage was super high and I didn't like the way I felt. Mom's had a lot of life experiences since then that have made her a lot more compassionate and less controlling. I bet that if she hadn't, she would be a lot more negative now towards me and my husband going back on medication. As it was, she kind of sighed, and asked 1 or 2 questions, and then dropped the subject. It's really hard for people to recognize that others' internal experiences can be vastly different from their own. I think it's a source of a lot of disagreement in the world today. Like a heterosexual person who has no homosexual attraction being convinced that all homosexuals are just faking it, or made some kind of intellectual choice to overcome their "natural" inclination. People who experience none of the symptoms of ADHD or depression can very easily believe that it's just like when they forgot one thing that one time, or when they felt a little sad for a rational reason. I think it actually frightens people to think that it's possible for another human being to be so different on the inside that they can't understand their experience at all.Developing compassion for others, and especially for yourself, is key to being able to accept your own differences--strengths, weaknesses, and all. I actually feel bad for those closed-minded people who want to beat  up on everyone, who believe that everyone can and should "suck it up" and get a "stiff upper lip." They won't have compassion for themselves when they run into their own limitations. [info] None [info] 1367426937 [info] test
daaanish [info] The Great Sadness I was diagnosed with depression a few years back but stopped taking the medication regularly and then eventually stopped altogether.There are times in my life that were much worse than I feel now. To be quite honest, compared to the past I am doing very well. However, the catalyst to my depression remains.I have what my wife and I call "the Great Sadness", what it has become to us is a chronic illness. The nature of this chronic illness is that I can't be happy in my own skin. I can be happy with my two sons and my wife, but whenever I am not around them I struggle to keep going. Since I go home to see them every night, I am able to reset very easily, and so this has kept my depression in check for quite some time. But sometimes I get morbid thoughts... what if my wife left me and I never saw her or my two sons again? I am defined by them, and losing them would kill me. I need to be able to find happiness on my own, something that motivates me and I have both autonomy and purpose for... this has alluded me all my life. I am not stupid person by any means. I am relatively financially well off, I have a great family, and I am well educated (in pursuit of my second graduate degree) however, too many times a day I am consumed my thoughts of despair and "the Great Sadness" fills me. It effects my relationship with everyone and it has caused me considerable difficulty keeping a job.What tools have those of you in the subreddit used to find an internal focus point for happiness? I am just an empty shell of a person if it isn't for my family... that's a dangerous rope to walk on.I need help. [info] None [info] 1425703513 [info] test
iwastherealso [info] I'm diagnosed with depression and have had suicidal thoughts, my dad committed suicide some years ago and he's not the first family member to have done so. It's not a trigger to me though, luckily, so I don't understand how it's being insensitive or whatever, it's related to something in the game, not just a random "lol look suicide!!1!!1!1". Triggers exist for people, so only they have any reason to react negatively to it. If anything, suicide is something that needs to be spoken about more in general life. [info] None [info] 1446605997 [info] test
puppyycuddlerr [info] Need Help Reaching Out Please Hi everyone, hope all of you are safe and sound during these scary times happening in our world today.I have been putting this off for the longest time because I've been too anxious and afraid to seek help and I'm finally taking the first step. These last 12 months, I was diagnosed with depression, escaped my abusive family, an abusive relationship, and currently (as of 2 days ago) am hurting over self-sabotaging a relationship with someone I have really come to like that i met a couple months ago. I talked to my friends about these unhealthy cycles I really don't mean put myself in but always do. I would really like to better myself in order to have healthier relationships in the future. :( I would really like to talk to someone.I'm on [psychologytoday.com](https://psychologytoday.com/) looking for therapists I can talk to... not sure what to say when reaching out for the first time? Is this site good for therapist hunting? Any tips or other sites you can recommend? Any other subs you would recommend as well? Or would anyone would just like to talk or share their experiences? Anything helps :)I would appreciate all the help! Thank you!I posted this on the depression sub too. Not sure where to start :/ [info] None [info] 1584592333 [info] test
Life-is-Apples [info] This is going to sound like a few others here that I've read but I need it.At the beginning of December I admitted myself into a mental hospital. My ex girlfriend (then girlfriend at the time of 4 years) was seriously considering leaving me and it had definitely set something off in my head that I haven't felt in a very long time. Before seeing her, of course. I was diagnosed with depression. I'm in disbelief that any of this happened.I grew up with a rough childhood witnessing all points in the triangle of abuse. This including marital infidelity with my parents, and my first girlfriend (the one before the one I just spoke about, she had cheated). It just stick with me. I wasn't supposed to make it this far. Now that I have, I feel like I've been punished for it ever since. I'm not me. I'm buried. I don't want to be around anymore. I live like this every single day making decisions with the flip of a coin. She made me promise her I'd search for help. That I would do whatever it takes. Even though she's me ex I know she cares. It tears me apart piece by piece every. Single. Night. Because I don't know if I'm moving forward or not. For fuck sake I drove 4 hours to the fucking beach just to see the ocean again in the middle of the night just to do it. Whatever it takes.I see a therapist every week. But I need something more in this life.I'm falling apart. Thanks for reading. [info] None [info] 1518413532 [info] test
alexia_muriel [info] You could always just try to do everything thing the same minus the weed for like a month and see how you feel. Could be a false relation like, you smoke alone and you also think more alone also.I have been diagnosed with depression and it doesn't seem to bother me, but all brains are a little different. [info] None [info] 1509325549 [info] test
Joey_unashamed116 [info] Yes they can be. I am diagnosed with depression because my brain does not produce enough serotonin or dopamine. I take medicine that boosts my production and I'm allowed to live life as I did before the disease was prevalent. I thank God for my medicine and Doctor every day.  [info] Christian (Cross) [info] 1464805304 [info] test
ruinedmaps [info] Dealing with the aftermaths of narcissistic abuse I have thought a long time about talking about this in public, yet, I never did. This is the first time I am doing it and it costs me a ton of emotional investment, yet, it's a thing I feel compelled to do, which I will explain in this text. I'll not fuzz around and will deliver as coldly and close to the facts as I can, maybe adding a bit of personal insight at the end of the paragraphs where I feel that they make sense. I am currently in the process of regaining trust into my gut, perceptions, and feelings, and for this initial post, I am trying to cling to facts as much as possible (which is why I will just outline key events and shifts) but will freely answer any question raised later, given it does not compromise anonymity. Here we go._______________________________________________A little more than one year ago, I cut contact with my best friend (Me: m/25, he: m/33) of five years, who was for the time being my best friend also my coworker and, additionally, superior, and I loved this man to bits, coming from a rather troubled upbringing - He took care of me and I was truly happy to be taken care of - By the time I met him, I was 19 and just moved out of my parents' house.Our friendship went smoothly for a long time (we lived around ~400 miles apart) until I relocated for work reasons - we wound up living in the same city then, working in a field which gave us both a fair share of (media) attention. We hung out every day, whenever possible, and we did both profit from each other. I went places, he went places, and there was no fight of competences as I did the creative work while my narc was doing administrative work, eventually being the head of the institution we worked for, and I got my promotion as well. As I was still the creative head, I got a lot more media and public attention naturally - I am not going to bore you with work details. Generally, I integrated REALLY WELL into my surrounding and had a lot of friends and acquaintances.During that time I started a pretty messy, intense, but beautiful relationship with a woman, which he eventually met as well before we were officially dating, and this was the breaking point. He tried his best to keep this from happening, by either planting doubts in me ("She's got a genius level intellect and she will go places, in five years she will probably make a lot of money in New York whereas you, well, are a musician and writer", or "Do you really feel that you can handle someone as smart and sensitive as her?"), or as I eventually found out, in her as well (he called me a notorious cheater, liar and egomaniac, all during the time we were still friends, as I was told eventually by the time I cut contact with him, while staying in touch with my ex). Nevertheless, the three of us hung out together most of the time.Eventually he talked her into sleeping with him. I still have no confirmation if this was consensual or not, as she never uttered a word about it after confessing and I am not going to question or make an assumption on her behalf, nevertheless, shortly after that, she broke up with me, describing this verbatim as "the worst thing that could have happened", which is very open to interpretation, and will play a core part later. Nevertheless, we stayed friends as the relationship was short, and the intensity just faded, nevertheless leading to occasional hookups.Occasionally, the three of us were seen together, with my ex and me spending more time together than with him as she seemed (to me) to avoid him, and eventually, he got word, or just suspected, that my ex and me were still hooking up, which left him incredibly jealous. I did not know anything about this at all and was oblivious to the situation as I had to deal with other things by that time, but he never uttered a word by that time.Tides turned after I ditched him for meeting up with her, and we ran into him at random. He clung to us and we sort of rolled with it but our "date night" was ruined and I spent the evening comforting my best friend. After this, my ex started avoiding him, and he started to get word of previously mentioned occasional hookups. Shortly after this, we had to go on a trip for work and shared a flat for the time, which he paid for me. On the first night - I arrived some time 7 am in the morning after performing in a different city - he confessed that he had sex with my ex, crying and hugging me, pleading for forgiveness. And I did, but something broke. After meeting someone on that event, I spent the rest of the time with her, rather than with him - It was nothing serious, though, and wasn't seen as a serious thing by me or the woman.Said woman lived on another continent and we got along really well, and my narc - who I still saw as my best friend despite his confession - tried to push me into a relationship with her, going as far as announcing that he would fly her over on his own expense so I could see her on my birthday. But as he was more and more aware that my ex and me were still hooking up (another friend accidentally dropped that info to him, as in, "Oh, is it true that X. and Y. are together again? I saw them making out!"), he kept pushing me into that relationship even more, but this time, it was used as a reward / punishment, along with insults ("Egomaniac", "narcissistic sociopath", "liar", just to name a few), and I avoided bringing that up altogether as I was scared. By that time - I briefly reported that my narc became the head of the institution we worked for - he also started inhibiting my work, by simply devaluing my ideas (he has, as he admitted before, "zero idea" about my field of work), or messing them up in post on purpose, which was then blamed on programming errors, or he flat out denied manipulation (I have proof that he indeed did).Eventually, we had a huge fight shortly after my birthday, after which I was removed from my job because I was a "sociopath" (He LOVES that word), we're mid summer 2016 now. I got along just fine and just stopped contacting him, being in deep shock, a situation in which I was VERY grateful that my ex was there to comfort me (we stopped hooking up by the time), and alongside me, she decided to cut contact with him as well, and I decided to make a career shift, away from writing to music. So, at first it faded, or so I thought, but I always had the urge to reach out to him and it still has not completely vanished, there was (relative) peace. I was, actually, sort of fine, shattered of course as I lost the person who probably meant the most in life to me.Over the end of the friendship, people started taking sides and apparently, he tried (and still tries) to convince people that I am awful.A couple weeks after, rape rumours were going around. I quoted my ex directly about the time they had sex, as she described it as "the worst thing that could have happened" a couple paragraphs above, and after she cut contact with him, we encountered him in clubs - and more than once, she left immediately and pleaded me to guide her to public transport or come with her as she was scared. I talked to a close friend about the possibility that this was indeed rape (and I will not make any claims), but nevertheless - These scenes were observed by others and eventually, people actually made that connection.Eventually, I was approached by him again (End 2016), and this was the first time I was assaulted by him. I kept a straight face since the friendship dissolved and just addressed that matter to very close friends who eventually pointed out the term "gaslighting" to me - But that is not exactly important, bottom line being that he had full control over me and my perception of myself, something I still struggle with. After the attack, while not being carried out completely as it was in public, I started cutting myself off from everyone as I started to get scared and extremely anxious that something like that may happen again - I have never been assaulted before and it was horrible.So I retreated from most social activities and dug myself in, and I noticed how I started to obsess, despite knowing how horrible this person is, I was still under his spell, and still too caught in his web of lies to see that this is how he tried to make me feel. I was, to say the least, DEAD SCARED. I was a rather popular person before but after this, I just retreated. I did not react. I educated myself enough, luckily, not to say anything in public, not on social media - I kept this mostly to my friends.March this year he started a smear campaign accusing me of date raping women frequently, providing "proof" in form of screenshots on which I repeated a rather tasteless joke from South Park ("Hot Cosby", if anyone's interested) and asked for Tylenol, of which you need a ton of to get someone unconscious, given you make the effort to get 40 pounds of that stuff in a bag and clubbing someone unconscious with that, and trying to accuse him of raping my ex, some were flat out fake. There was no single word of truth written in these statements, giving out my personal info (full name, address, current occupation, ...) and leaving me extremely vulnerable as he revealed a very private situation out to the open without giving me any opportunity to defend myself (which I did not do in other places either way as I firmly believed that no one would believe me), intensifying my paranoia. A police report because of slander led to nothing. I retreated even more, and because I was scared, I moved, but fell into a deep depressive hole as I felt that I could not do anything. The rumours spread and I felt extremely, extremely powerless, and the rumours took its toll on my reputation, and I stopped going out not knowing what is said about me, and what I would be confronted with - accusations or straight-up assault? I just retreated.After a 2nd attack, this time in presence of my mother in a supermarket (I left out a few smaller things like insults), I committed myself into psychiatry after breaking down while reporting the incident to the police. I was diagnosed with depressions, PTSD and severe adjustment disorder, except for depression all linked to this situation, my self-imposed isolation out of sheer fear making it a lot worse. After psychiatry, I retreated to my parent's place, way outside town and basically spent two weeks sleeping, recovering and enjoying a safe, and pressure free, environment that I desperately needed to come back to my senses and take control of my life again. I moved again, and moved in with two amazing people, and noticed how much of a hard time I have trusting people, so f*cking hooray, trust issues making my hard time rebuilding my circle again even harder (One of my flatmates is now one of my closest friends and the notion that I am not solely depending on the narc's views, which is therapeutic).The most recent attack, again, accompanied by a Facebook post, was carried out early November in a club, going as far as spitting in my face, pouring beer over my head, pushing me around. I was in emotional shell shock in this moment. I could not do anything, I could not move, I just stared blankly, eventually scrambling the last few remainders of my courage and telling him that I am done with this conversation and left, or escaped, to my friends. I left, shattered - He did not get kicked out despite we reported him to securities. Since then it got worse again. I keep re-living situations involuntarily, as I felt compelled to write this as an outlet, as I feel the need to isolate myself again and rather vomit it out than letting it eat me alive again.Since then: I was both scared to go to the police again, as much as I am scared to go out when not alone. But I am not as trapped as I was before.I found a strategy for myself. I started seeing myself as a survivor rather than being a victim. Survivors wear wounds, they naturally do, and they take time to recover, victims are by default passive. I still fall back into my habit of beating myself up over shit like this but not as much as I used to, it's going uphill.Making the turn back to the narc: I see, with some gratification, that he still obsesses over me and sh*t talks me at any possible opportunity, yet I see as well that he is losing it. He keeps feeding people lies, but as less and less people fall for it, he still does it, and that he is still onto it, I cannot understand it and I cannot cope. I like comparing him to the Joker (with me being a physically way less impressive Batman). He is unpredictable, erratic and I cannot do anything to end this once and for all for good._____________________________Feel free to share your comments and thoughts regarding this. I'm happy to ask any questions as this may really help me - This is the first time I share this story online. I do not exactly know where I am going with this post, and I am not quite sure about the morale of this story, if you come up with a better one than me, or advice, I am happy to hear from you. [info] None [info] 1512689682 [info] test
MartinzPL [info] The final verse from *People II 2: Still Peoplin'* by AJJ, but really the whole message of the song could also count.&gt;You don't have it any better, you don't have it any worse&gt;You're an irreplaceable human soul with your own understanding of what it means to suffer&gt;And that's a huge bummerIt gave me a lot of perspective on my own life and other people's lives. About a year ago or so I was diagnosed with depression. Now I'd like to think I'm recovering, but I'm still not sure. Life felt miserable. I felt completely misunderstood by everyone around, felt like absolutely nobody could understand what I mean and what I'm talking about when I talk about my situation and how I feel. Then I stumbled upon this song, I don't even remember how... but something clicked in me when I heard those lyrics.I'm a unique being with my own definition of suffering - and so is everyone else. And that is perfectly okay. That is what makes us human.There is no single definition of pain. There is no scale on which suffering can be measured. There is no standard to which your misery can be compared. Every suffering is "viable". What I consider a minor inconvenience might be a real issue to someone else, and vice versa.We may not understand the pain other people go through, but that doesn't mean we can't try to help them. Telling someone that their suffering is not "real" or not justified is just about the worst thing that you can do to someone. And that's why I try to help others when they feel bad. I've felt alone before. It's not a fun experience. And if I can do something to help someone else not feel that way - even if it's just to listen to them, let them vent, try to give some advice - I'm going to do just that. [info] None [info] 1526042762 [info] test
12345tommy [info] Hey man I saw that and I can totally relate. I was diagnosed with depression as well. Keep up the fight brother. There's at least this guy in Ohio pulling for you.  [info] None [info] 1449710978 [info] test
bummer85 [info] You’re not screwed up, but it sounds like you are suffering from severe depression. I am diagnosed with depression and can understand these feelings you described. If the idea of taking medication feels extreme right now, seek out a reputable therapist first and take it one step at a time. Just know that you’re not alone and there are people out there who understand what you’re going through.  [info] None [info] 1522206256 [info] test
RogueDarkJedi [info] If just one person, believes in you [Just watch this. It helped me](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0Zzfdlxjx4Y)Hello everyone,Recently I was diagnosed with depression, and after talking to RainbowCrash, I feel like sharing.A couple of months ago (think around Parasprites celebration) I had lost my house. I had failed a class I could not fail and I had run out of money.I was in tears. I had no money. The government claimed that because of my parents credit ratings, I could not qualify for financial aid to continue my education.I had lost faith in myself. I fell into this spiral. I became obsessive. Being on the subreddit allowed me to escape. To run from my fears. To run from failure.But it never worked. As much as I tried to fight it, I kept failing. And finally, I had hit it. Someone said I should just leave. They didn't really mean it, but I couldn't interpret that. I took that as I was not wanted (I worked it out with this person later).So there I was on a Friday night sitting on the floor in my empty room in tears. No one wanted me. I was seriously considering deleting my reddit account. I don't know why. There were people on Reddit trying to help me. I don't know why.I don't know why.I was crying. I felt like I had nothing. Tears streamed down from my face. I hadn't slept in three days. The video I linked to was playing in the background.I was trying to escape. But I couldn't.Suddenly Illusion messaged me over Steam. I apologized for being such a self-righteous dick. I knew no one wanted me. He said that I was valued. I didn't feel valued.Then Crashy messaged me and told me everything would be alright.The mods made me feel welcome.Over time, I started working towards overcoming my depression, and while I still haven't done it, I'm getting there.I know this sounds corny, but if it weren't for this subreddit, my friends, Random_Acts_Of_Pizza, ReillyBoy, this TV show and my family I probably wouldn't be here.So I want to thank you all so much from the bottom of my heart.Thank you to:* Rollout and the other RAOP mods for providing me dinner on that night* Reillyboy and others for buying me new clothes, food and allowing me to keep my place for another week* Our mods* Illusion &amp; Opti for telling me I was valued* RainbowCrashy for sending me money to pay for food for 2.5 weeks* Pyrotix for trying to cheer me up* knocknix, Dorigard, TNF, kin, ovenmitt, Books, Emu, and everypony else from Synchtube* CrimsonBristle for always being there* Moon for being so damn positive* ILF for just being you* Fabricant for listening* timbaer for being willing to help at all times* Killbunny and Mcore for believing in me* Cookie for being awesome* Cheesemoo for being excited over all my little successes and cheering me on* Nom and Psychoduck for just being there* pariah1165 for teaching me to value others* TVF for inviting me to make stencil art* My teacher for giving me another chance and letting me pass the class* My friends* For all of you for believing in meThank you guys for being there for me. I don't know where I would be without you.*tears**I just don't know.*---EDIT: So it's been over 10 hours since I posted this. I've been reading all of your comments. And let me tell you, I was crying the entire time (both Psychoduck and ILF can attest to that).I'm going to try to reply to each one of you personally, and I know the majority of comments will be me saying thank you.Because I really truly mean it. Thank you all for being here. Thank you for listening.---[Reflection](http://www.reddit.com/r/mylittlepony/comments/lh9a9/this_too_shall_pass/) [info]  [info] 1318936166 [info] test
